Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
PART 2
POWERS

11-109-201. Powers of trust companies.

A trust company shall be incorporated under and subject to the general corporation laws of this state not inconsistent with this article. The business activities of a trust company in this state shall be limited to the exercise of the power to:

Act or be appointed by a court to act in like manner as an individual, an executor, a personal representative, a trustee, an administrator, a guardian, a conservator, an assignee, a custodian, a receiver, or a depository or in any other fiduciary capacity for any purposes permitted by law;

Act as a transfer agent, a registrar, an escrow agent, or an attorney-in-fact and to receive, manage, and apply sinking funds;

Maintain and rent safe deposit and safekeeping facilities;

Receive and maintain savings deposits, time deposits, and certificates of deposit, and to pay interest thereon at the rates permitted state banks under section 11-105-102 (3), subject to the restrictions of section 11-109-204;

Exercise the same investment powers as an individual fiduciary under like circumstances;

Accept and execute any fiduciary business permitted by the laws of this state or any other state and the United States and to establish common trust funds as provided by article 24 of this title;

Take oaths and execute affidavits by the oath or affidavit of the president, vice-presidents, secretary, assistant secretary, manager, trust officer, or assistant trust officer;

Act as an investment adviser under any applicable law;

Do and perform any other acts necessary or proper to exercise the powers enumerated in this section.

Except for those powers specifically authorized in subsection (1) of this section and section 11-109-907, a trust company shall not have the power to conduct a banking business, receive and maintain transaction deposit accounts, nor use the word "bank" in its name.

As authorized pursuant to section 10-2-601 (2), C.R.S., a trust company may, pursuant to federal law or under such rules as may be adopted by the banking board or the commissioner of insurance pursuant to section 10-2-601, C.R.S., act as the agent for any insurance company authorized to do business in this state by soliciting and selling insurance and collecting premiums on policies issued by such company. For such services, a trust company may receive such fees or commissions as may be agreed between the trust company and the insurance company.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1180, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-23-103 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-109-202. Offices of trust companies.

Each trust company shall have and continuously maintain a principal office in this state.

Each executive officer at the principal office is an agent of the trust company for service of process.

A trust company may change its principal office to any location within this state by filing a written notice with the banking board. The written notice shall contain:

The name of the trust company;

The street address of its principal office before the change;

The street address to which the principal office is to be changed; and

A copy of the resolution authorizing the change adopted by the board of directors of the trust company.

The change of principal office shall take effect on the thirty-first day after the date the banking board receives the notice pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection (1), unless:

The banking board establishes an earlier or later date; or

Prior to such day the banking board notifies the trust company that the trust company shall establish, to the satisfaction of the banking board, that the relocation is consistent with the original determination made under section 11-109-306 for the establishment of a trust company at that location, in which event the change of principal office shall take effect when approved by the commissioner.

A trust company may act as a fiduciary and engage in a trust business at each trust office as permitted by this article.

A trust company may not act as a fiduciary but may otherwise engage in a trust business at a representative trust office as permitted by this article.

A trust company may establish or acquire and maintain trust offices or representative trust offices anywhere in this state.

A trust company desiring to establish or acquire and maintain an additional office shall file a written notice with the banking board. The written notice shall contain the following:

The name of the trust company;

The location of the proposed additional office; and

Information indicating whether the additional office will be a trust office or a representative trust office.

The trust company shall also furnish a copy of the resolution authorizing the additional office adopted by the board of directors of the trust company and shall pay the filing fee, if any, prescribed by the banking board.

The trust company may commence business at the additional office on the thirty-first day after the date the banking board receives the notice, unless the banking board specifies an earlier or later date.

The thirty-day period of review may be extended by the banking board on a determination that the written notice raises issues that require additional information or additional time for analysis. If the period of review is extended, the trust company may establish the additional office only on prior written approval by the banking board.

The banking board may deny approval of the additional office if the banking board finds that the trust company lacks sufficient financial resources to undertake the proposed expansion without adversely affecting its safety or soundness or that establishment of the proposed office would be contrary to the public interest.

A trust company chartered by a state other than Colorado may establish and maintain a trust office or representative trust office anywhere in this state if the establishment and operation of such office is authorized expressly by rules promulgated by the banking board for that purpose. The out-of-state trust company must provide to the banking board notice of its intent to open an office at least sixty days before opening such office for business.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1181, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(5) amended, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1483, § 50, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-23-103.2 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-109-203. Activities not requiring a charter.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article 109 to the contrary, a company does not engage in the trust business, or in any other business in a manner requiring a charter, under this article 109 or in an unauthorized trust activity by:

Acting in the scope of authority as an agent of a trust institution;

Rendering a service customarily performed by an attorney or law firm in a manner approved and authorized by the Colorado supreme court;

Acting as trustee under a deed of trust delivered only as security for the payment of money or for the performance of another act;

Receiving and distributing rents and proceeds of sale as a licensed real estate broker on behalf of a principal in a manner authorized by the real estate commission pursuant to article 10 of title 12;

Engaging in a securities transaction or providing an investment advisory service as a licensed and registered broker-dealer, investment advisor, or registered representative of an investment advisor, if the activity is regulated by the securities commissioner or the federal securities and exchange commission;

Engaging in the sale and administration of an insurance product as an insurance company or agent licensed by the division of insurance to the extent that the activity is regulated by the division of insurance;

Acting as trustee for a public, private, or independent institution of higher education or a university system, including an institution of higher education's or university system's affiliated foundations or corporations, with respect to endowment funds or other funds owned, controlled, provided to, or otherwise made available to such institution or system with respect to its educational or research purposes;

Rendering services customarily performed by a certified public accountant in a manner authorized by article 100 of title 12;

If the company is a trust institution and is not otherwise prohibited from engaging in a trust business in this state:

Marketing or soliciting in this state through the mails, telephone, any electronic means, or in person with respect to acting or proposing to act as a fiduciary outside of this state;

Delivering money or other intangible assets and receiving the money or other intangible assets from a client or other person in this state; or

Accepting or executing outside of this state a trust of any client or otherwise acting as a fiduciary outside of this state for any client.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1182, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

IP(1), (1)(d), and (1)(h) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1661, § 65, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-23-103.3 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-109-204. Federal deposit insurance required.

No trust company may accept or hold savings deposits, time deposits, or certificates of deposit pursuant to section 11-109-201 (1)(d) unless such deposits are insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor.

Each trust company shall immediately give notice to the banking board when it has applied to the federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor for deposit insurance and, thereafter, shall give bi-monthly reports on the status of its application for deposit insurance to the banking board until final disposition of the application is made.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1183, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-23-103.5 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-109-205. Transactions with affiliates.

Unless otherwise prohibited by law, a trust company and its affiliates may engage in any of the transactions described in subsection (2) of this section if such transactions are either:

On terms and under circumstances, including credit standards, that are substantially the same, or at least as favorable to such trust company or its subsidiary, as those prevailing at the time for comparable transactions with or involving nonaffiliated companies; or

In the absence of comparable transactions, on terms and under circumstances, including credit standards, that in good faith would be offered to, or would apply to, nonaffiliated companies.

Transactions covered. Subsection (1) of this section shall apply to the following:

A purchase of, or an investment in, securities issued by the affiliate;

A purchase of assets, including assets subject to an agreement to repurchase, from the affiliate;

The acceptance of securities issued by the affiliate as collateral security for a loan or extension of credit to any person or company;

The sale of securities or other assets to an affiliate, including assets subject to an agreement to repurchase;

The payment of money or the furnishing of services to an affiliate under contract, lease, or otherwise;

Any transaction in which an affiliate acts as an agent or broker or receives a fee for its services for the trust company or for any other person; and

Any transaction or series of transactions with a third party including those in which an affiliate has a financial interest in the third party or is a participant in such transaction or series of transactions.

A company or shareholder shall be deemed to have control over another company if such company or shareholder:

Directly or indirectly, or acting through one or more other persons, owns, controls, or has power to vote twenty-five percent or more of any class of voting securities of the other company; or

Controls in any manner the election of a majority of the directors or trustees of the other company.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, no company shall be deemed to own or control another company by virtue of its ownership or control of shares in a fiduciary capacity or if the company owning or controlling such shares is a business trust.

The banking board may promulgate rules to exempt transactions or relationships from the requirements of this section if the banking board finds such exemptions are in the public interest and consistent with the purposes of this section.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Affiliate" with respect to a trust company means:

Any company that controls the trust company and any other company that is controlled by the company that controls the trust company;

Any company that is controlled, directly or indirectly, by a trust or otherwise, by or for the benefit of shareholders who beneficially or otherwise control, directly or indirectly, by trust or otherwise, the trust company or any company that controls the trust company;

Any company in which a majority of its directors or trustees constitute a majority of the persons holding any such office with the trust company or any company that controls the trust company;

Any company, including a real estate investment trust, that is sponsored and advised on a contractual basis by the trust company or any subsidiary or affiliate of the trust company; and

Any investment company with respect to which a trust company or any affiliate thereof is an investment advisor as defined in 15 U.S.C. sec. 80a-2 (a)(20).

"Affiliate" with respect to a trust company does not include:

Any company that is a subsidiary of a trust company; and

Any company engaged solely in holding the premises of the trust company.

"Company" means a corporation, partnership, business trust, association, or similar organization and, unless specifically excluded, the term "company" includes a "trust company" and a "bank".

"Securities" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 11-51-201 (17).

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1183, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-23-103.7 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-109-206. Trust company organized as a limited liability company.

Pursuant to section 11-102-104 (5.5)(c), a trust company charter may be issued to a limited liability company that otherwise meets the requirements of this article.

A trust company organized as a limited liability company shall not be required to exist in perpetuity; except that the articles of organization of such a trust company shall provide for a method to extend the existence of the trust company in the event that termination occurs. In addition, the articles of organization of such a trust company shall require that liquidation of the limited liability company conform with the requirements of this code.

Upon approval of the banking board, a trust company organized as a limited liability company may be merged with or converted into another entity regardless of the form of the surviving entity, so long as the surviving entity satisfies the requirements of this code.

Upon approval of the banking board, a trust company organized as a corporation may be merged with or converted into a limited liability company, so long as it satisfies the requirements of this code.

A trust company organized as a limited liability company shall have a written operating agreement containing any provisions for the affairs of the trust company and the conduct of its business as may be agreed upon by the members and which provisions are consistent with this code and the "Colorado Limited Liability Company Act", article 80 of title 7, C.R.S.

A copy of the written operating agreement shall be filed with the banking board prior to the granting of a charter to the trust company, and any amendments to the operating agreement shall be filed with and approved by the banking board prior to adoption.

The banking board may promulgate rules establishing additional requirements relating to operating agreements to implement the provisions of this section.

All distributions made by a trust company organized as a limited liability company to its members shall be subject to the requirements applicable to dividends issued by a trust company organized as a corporation under this code and the rules of the banking board.

For purposes of implementing this section, the following definition constructions shall apply:

Where this code refers to "articles of incorporation", that term shall be construed to apply to a limited liability company's articles of organization, as that term is defined in section 7-80-102 (1), C.R.S.;

Where this code refers to "bylaws", that term shall be construed to apply to a limited liability company's operating agreement, as that term is defined in section 7-80-102 (11), C.R.S.;

Where this code refers to "common stock" or "shares" of a trust company, such terms shall be construed to apply to a limited liability company's membership interests;

Where this code refers to a "corporation", such term shall be construed to include a limited liability company organized under the "Colorado Limited Liability Company Act", article 80 of title 7, C.R.S., which limited liability company conforms to this section and the requirements established by the banking board pursuant to section 11-102-104 (5.5);

Where this code refers to a "director" or a "board of directors" of a trust company, such terms shall be construed to apply to a manager or the managers of a limited liability company;

Where this code refers to an "incorporator", such term shall be construed to apply to the organizers of a limited liability company;

Where this code refers to a "shareholder" or a "stockholder" of a trust company, such terms shall be construed to apply to a member of a limited liability company.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 1749, § 6, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Section 11-23-102.7 as enacted by House Bill 03-1106 was harmonized with House Bill 03-1257 and relocated as § 11-109-206.